Wisconsin, session 2025, SB949.
do enact as follows:SB949,11Section 1. 175.60 (2g) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB949,2,42175.60 (2g) (a) A licensee or an out-of-state licensee may carry a concealed 3weapon anywhere in this state except as provided under subs. (15m) and (16) and 4ss. 941.236, 943.13 (1m) (c), and 948.605 (2) (b) 1r.SB949,25Section 2. 175.60 (5) (a) 6. of the statutes is amended to read:SB949,2,116175.60 (5) (a) 6. A statement of the places under sub. (16) and s. 941.236 7where a licensee is prohibited from carrying a weapon, as well as an explanation of 8the provisions under sub. (15m) and ss. 943.13 (1m) (c) and 948.605 (2) (b) 1r. that 9could limit the places where the licensee may carry a weapon, with a place for the 10applicant to sign his or her name to indicate that he or she has read and 11understands the statement.SB949,312Section 3. 938.34 (14q) of the statutes is amended to read:SB949,2,2313938.34 (14q) Certain bomb scares and firearm violations. In addition to 14any other disposition imposed under this section, if the juvenile is found to have 15violated s. 947.015 and the property involved is owned or leased by the state or any 16political subdivision of the state, or if the property involved is a school premises, as 17defined in s. 948.61 (1) (c), or if the juvenile is found to have violated s. 941.235, 18941.236, or 948.605, immediately suspend the juvenile’s operating privilege, as 19defined in s. 340.01 (40), for 2 years. The court shall immediately forward to the 20department of transportation the notice of suspension, stating that the suspension 21is for a violation of s. 947.015 involving school premises, or for a violation of s. 22941.235, 941.236, or 948.605. If otherwise eligible, the juvenile is eligible for an 23occupational license under s. 343.10.SB949,424Section 4. 938.78 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB949,3,231938.78 (3) Release of information when escape or absence; rules. If a 2juvenile adjudged delinquent under s. 48.12, 1993 stats., or s. 938.12 or found to be 3in need of protection or services under s. 48.13 (12) or (14), 1993 stats., or s. 938.13 4(12) or (14) on the basis of a violation of s. 943.23 (1m) or (1r), 1999 stats., or s. 5943.23 (1g), 2021 stats., or s. 941.10, 941.11, 941.20, 941.21, 941.23, 941.231, 6941.235, 941.236, 941.237, 941.26, 941.28, 941.295, 941.298, 941.30, 941.31, 7941.32, 941.325, 943.02, 943.03, 943.04, 943.10 (2) (a), 943.231 (1), 943.32 (2), 8948.02, 948.025, 948.03, 948.05, 948.055, 948.085 (2), 948.60, 948.605, or 948.61 or 9any crime specified in ch. 940 has escaped from a juvenile correctional facility, 10residential care center for children and youth, secured residential care center for 11children and youth, inpatient facility, as defined in s. 51.01 (10), juvenile detention 12facility, or juvenile portion of a county jail, or from the custody of a peace officer or 13a guard of such a facility, center, or jail, or has been allowed to leave a juvenile 14correctional facility, residential care center for children and youth, secured 15residential care center for children and youth, inpatient facility, juvenile detention 16facility, or juvenile portion of a county jail for a specified time period and is absent 17from the facility, center, home, or jail for more than 12 hours after the expiration of 18the specified period, the department of corrections or county department, 19whichever has supervision over the juvenile, may release the juvenile’s name and 20any information about the juvenile that is necessary for the protection of the public 21or to secure the juvenile’s return to the facility, center, home, or jail. The 22department of corrections shall promulgate rules establishing guidelines for the 23release of the juvenile’s name or information about the juvenile to the public.SB949,51Section 5. 939.632 (1) (e) 3. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 2Act 24, is amended to read:SB949,4,53939.632 (1) (e) 3. Any misdemeanor under s. 940.225 (3m), 940.32 (2), 940.42, 4940.44, 940.60 (1), 941.20 (1), 941.23, 941.231, 941.235, 941.236, or 941.38 (3) or s. 5940.19 (1), 2023 stats.SB949,66Section 6. 941.236 of the statutes is created to read:SB949,4,97941.236 Carrying firearm at a polling place. (1) A person who 8intentionally goes armed with a firearm in, or within 100 feet of, any of the 9following places is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor:SB949,4,1210(a) A part of a building that is being used as a polling place, as defined in s. 115.02 (15). The prohibition under this paragraph begins one hour before the polling 12place opens and ends one hour after the polling place closes.SB949,4,1413(b) A location where election officials, as defined in s. 5.02 (4e), are conducting 14a canvass under subch. II of ch. 7 or a recount under s. 9.01.SB949,4,1515(2) Subsection (1) does not apply to any of the following:SB949,4,1716(a) A person who is employed in this state by a public agency as a law 17enforcement officer and to whom s. 941.23 (1) (g) 2. to 5. and (2) (b) 1. to 3. applies.SB949,4,1918(b) A qualified out-of-state law enforcement officer to whom s. 941.23 (2) (b) 1. 19to 3. applies.SB949,4,2020(c) A former officer to whom s. 941.23 (2) (c) 1. to 7. applies.SB949,4,2221(d) A person who owns or occupies private property that is within the 22prohibited distance while the person is on the property.SB949,5,223(e) A private security person, as defined in s. 440.26 (1m), who is employed on 1property that is within the prohibited distance and who is going armed in the line of 2duty.SB949,73Section 7. 973.137 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB949,5,44973.137 (1) A violation of s. 941.235 or 941.236.SB949,5,55